Louisiana, session 2026, SB10.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 11:102(B)(1)(a), and 1332.1(B)(1)(d)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§102. Employer contributions; determination; state systems
* * *
B.(1)(a) Except as provided in R.S. 11:102.1, 102.2, 102.3, 102.4, and 102.5
and in Paragraph (5) of this Subsection, for each fiscal year, commencing with Fiscal
Year 1989-1990, for each of the public retirement systems referenced in Subsection
A of this Section, the legislature shall set the required employer contribution rate for
each system or plan equal to the sum of the following:
* * *
§1332.1. Permanent benefit increase funding account
* * *
B.(1) The PBI account shall be credited as follows:
* * *
(d) In no event shall a credit be made to the PBI account that would cause the
balance in the account to exceed the reserve necessary to grant two permanent
benefit increases of two percent and two supplemental permanent benefit increases
of two percent in accordance with the provisions of this Section. Any contributions
received from payment of the account funding contribution rate in compliance with
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 10 ENROLLED
R.S. 11:102(F)(4) that would cause the account balance to exceed this reserve if
deposited in the account shall be applied as provided in R.S. 11:102.4 shall be
amortized based on the amortization period specified in R.S. 11:102(F)(2).
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 11:102(F)(3), 102.4, and 1332 are hereby repealed.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.